District of Columbia statutes.
47-2009

Tax to be separately stated.

Upon each sale of tangible personal property or services, the gross receipts from which are taxable under this chapter, the reimbursement of tax to be collected by the vendor from the purchaser under the provisions of this chapter shall be stated and charged separately from the sales price and shown separately on any record thereof at the time the sale is made or evidence of sale issued or employed by the vendor.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 117, ch. 146, title I, § 129
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

Compensating-use tax, collection of tax by vendor, see § 47-2203.
Compensating-use tax, nonresident vendors, see § 47-2204.

Cross References

This section is referenced in § 47-2203 and § 47-2204.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 47-2009.
1973 Ed., § 47-2606.

Prior Codifications